Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5011
Chairperson; powers and duties.

The chairperson may call special meetings of the commission at such times as its business requires. The chairperson may also administer oaths and affirmations and sign all orders, certificates, and process in the name of the commission. The chairperson shall attest all orders, certificates, and process with the official seal of the commission. In the absence of the chairperson the vice-chairperson may perform the duties of the chairperson. Orders, certificates, and process under the official seal of the commission may be enforced by the district court for Lancaster County.

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 397, § 36;

Laws 2003, LB 291, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB167, § 5.